Utah statutes.
34-45-105.   Cause of action for noncompliance -- Remedies.
(1)  An individual who is injured, physically or otherwise, as a result of any
policy or rule prohibited by Section 34-45-103, may bring a civil action in a
court of competent jurisdiction against any person that violates the
provisions of Section 34-45-103.
(2)  Any individual who asserts a claim under this section is entitled to
request:
(a)  declaratory relief;
(b)  temporary or permanent injunctive relief to prevent the threatened or
continued violation;
(c)  recovery for actual damages sustained; and
(d)  punitive damages, if:
(i)  serious bodily injury or death occurs as a result of the violation of
Section 34-45-103; or
(ii)  the person who violates Section 34-45-103 has previously been notified
by the attorney general that a policy or rule violates Section 34-45-103.
(3)  The prevailing party in an action brought under this chapter may recover
its court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred.
(4)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or held to affect any rights
or claims made in relation to Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act.
